South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Human Personhood at Conception Act." SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-8.  (A) As used in this article, "person" or "persons" means every human being beginning at conception. (B) As used in this article, "fertilization" means the fecundation of the ovum by the spermatozoon. (C) As used in this article, "conception" means fertilization. SECTION 3.  Chapter 41, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----